Oklahoma, session 2025, SB310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. REPEALER 62 O.S. 2021, Sections 7001, 7002,


7003, as amended by Section 1, Chapter 125, O.S.L. 2023, 7004, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 125, O.S.L. 2023, and 7005, as amended


by Section 3, Chapter 125, O.S.L. 2023 (62 O.S. Supp. 2024, Sections


7003, 7004, and 7005), are hereby repealed.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1444 QD 12/31/2024 12:00:24 AM

Req. No. 1444 Page 1